Utah statutes.
77-28b-5.   Role of institution warden.

The warden shall sign Form III, Notice Regarding International Prisoner Transfer, and forward the application and the material required in Section 77-28b-4 in triplicate to the Department of Corrections Inmate Placement Program Bureau.



Enacted by Chapter 324, 1990 General Session

